Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 9. Adoption, Administration, and Enforcement

§ 4440.
Administration; finance.

Appropriations may be made by any municipality to finance the work of planning commissions, regional planning commissions, administrative officers, appropriate municipal panels, and other officials in the preparation, adoption, administration, and enforcement of development plans and supporting plans, bylaws, capital budgets and programs, and other regulatory and nonregulatory efforts to implement the municipal plan, and to support or oppose, upon appeal to the courts, decisions of an appropriate municipal panel. For these same purposes, any municipality may accept gifts and grants of money and services from private sources and from the State and federal governments.

The legislative body may prescribe reasonable fees to be charged with respect to the administration of bylaws and for the administration of development review. These fees may include the cost of posting and publishing notices and holding public hearings and the cost of conducting periodic inspections during the installation of public improvements. These fees may be required to be payable by the applicant upon submission of the application or prior to issuance of permits or certificates of occupancy.

The legislative body may set reasonable fees for filing of notices of appeal and for other acts as it deems proper, the payment of which shall be a condition to the validity of the filing or act under this chapter.

The legislative body may establish procedures and standards for requiring an applicant to pay for reasonable costs of an independent technical review of the application.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 99.

§ 4441.
Preparation of bylaws and regulatory tools; amendment or repeal.

A municipality may have one or more bylaws. Any bylaw for a municipality shall be prepared by or at the direction of the planning commission of the municipality and shall have the purpose of implementing the plan. An amendment or repeal of a bylaw may be prepared by the planning commission or by any other person or body.

A proposed amendment or repeal prepared by a person or body other than the planning commission shall be submitted in writing along with any supporting documents to the planning commission. The planning commission may then proceed under this subchapter as if the amendment or repeal had been prepared by the commission. However, if the proposed amendment or repeal of a bylaw is supported by a petition signed by not less than five percent of the voters of the municipality, the commission shall correct any technical deficiency and shall, without otherwise changing the amendment or repeal, promptly proceed in accordance with subsections (c) through (g) of this section, as if it had been prepared by the commission.

When considering an amendment to a bylaw, the planning commission shall prepare and approve a written report on the proposal. A single report may be prepared so as to satisfy the requirements of this subsection concerning bylaw amendments and subsection 4384(c) of this title concerning plan amendments. The Department of Housing and Community Development shall provide all municipalities with a form for this report. The report shall provide a brief explanation of the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal and shall include a statement of purpose as required for notice under section 4444 of this title, and shall include findings regarding how the proposal:

Conforms with or furthers the goals and policies contained in the municipal plan, including the effect of the proposal on the availability of safe and affordable housing.

Is compatible with the proposed future land uses and densities of the municipal plan.

Carries out, as applicable, any specific proposals for any planned community facilities.

The planning commission shall hold at least one public hearing within the municipality after public notice on any proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal.

At least 15 days prior to the first hearing, a copy of the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal and the written report shall be delivered physically or electronically with proof of receipt or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to each of the following:

The chair of the planning commission of each abutting municipality, or in the absence of any planning commission in a municipality, the clerk of that abutting municipality.

The executive director of the regional planning commission of the area in which the municipality is located.

The Department of Housing and Community Development within the Agency of Commerce and Community Development.

Any of the bodies identified in subsection (e) of this section, or their representatives, may submit comments on the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal to the planning commission, or may appear and be heard in any proceeding with respect to the adoption of the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal.

The planning commission may make revisions to a proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal and to the written report, and shall then submit the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal and the written report to the legislative body of the municipality. However, if requested by the legislative body or if a proposed amendment was supported by a petition signed by not less than five percent of the voters of the municipality, the planning commission shall promptly submit the amendment, with changes only to correct technical deficiencies, to the legislative body of the municipality, together with any recommendation or opinion it considers appropriate. Simultaneously with the submission, the planning commission shall file with the clerk of the municipality a copy of the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal, and the written report for public review.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 100; amended

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 4442.
Adoption of bylaws and related regulatory tools; amendment or repeal.

Public hearings. Not less than 15 nor more than 120 days after a proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal is submitted to the legislative body of a municipality under section 4441 of this title, the legislative body shall hold the first of one or more public hearings, after public notice, on the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal, and shall make copies of the proposal and the written report of the planning commission available to the public upon request. Failure to hold a hearing within the 120 days shall not invalidate the adoption of the bylaw or amendment or the validity of any repeal.

Amendment of proposal. The legislative body may make minor changes to the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal, but shall not do so less than 14 days prior to the final public hearing. If the legislative body at any time makes substantial changes in the concept, meaning, or extent of the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal, it shall warn a new public hearing or hearings under subsection (a) of this section. If any part of the proposal is changed, the legislative body at least 10 days prior to the hearing shall file a copy of the changed proposal with the clerk of the municipality and with the planning commission. The planning commission shall amend the report prepared pursuant to subsection 4441(c) of this title to reflect the changes made by the legislative body and shall submit that amended report to the legislative body at or prior to the public hearing.

Routine adoption.

A bylaw, bylaw amendment, or bylaw repeal shall be adopted by a majority of the members of the legislative body at a meeting that is held after the final public hearing, and shall be effective 21 days after adoption unless, by action of the legislative body, the bylaw, bylaw amendment, or bylaw repeal is warned for adoption by the municipality by Australian ballot at a special or regular meeting of the municipality.

However, a rural town as defined in section 4303 of this chapter, by vote of that town at a special or regular meeting duly warned on the issue, may elect to require that bylaws, bylaw amendments, or bylaw repeals shall be adopted by vote of the town by Australian ballot at a special or regular meeting duly warned on the issue. That procedure shall then apply until rescinded by the voters at a regular or special meeting of the town.

Petition for popular vote. Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1) of this section, a vote by the legislative body on a bylaw, amendment, or repeal shall not take effect if five percent of the voters of the municipality petition for a meeting of the municipality to consider the bylaw, amendment, or repeal, and the petition is filed within 20 days of the vote. In that case, a meeting of the municipality shall be duly warned for the purpose of acting by Australian ballot upon the bylaw, amendment, or repeal.

Multipurpose hearings. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any public hearing held under this chapter to be held for more than one purpose under this chapter. A municipality may prepare and adopt a plan, one or more bylaws, and a capital budget and program in the same proceedings. However, all the provisions of this chapter applicable to each purpose of the hearing shall be complied with.

Unorganized towns and gores. A bylaw, amendment, or repeal of a bylaw of an unorganized town or gore shall be adopted by a majority of votes cast at a meeting of the regional planning commission in which the unorganized town or gore is located at which a quorum is present. However, a bylaw, amendment, or repeal of a bylaw of the unified towns and gores of Essex County, namely Averill, Avery’s Gore, Ferdinand, Lewis, Warner’s Grant, and Warren’s Gore, shall be adopted by the board of governors.

Time for action. If the proposed bylaw, amendment, or repeal is not approved or rejected under subsection (c) of this section within one year of the date of the final hearing of the planning commission, it shall be considered disapproved unless five percent of the voters of the municipality petition for a meeting of the municipality to consider the bylaw, amendment, or repeal, and the petition is filed within 60 days of the end of that year. In that case, a meeting of the municipality shall be duly warned for the purpose of acting upon the bylaw, amendment, or repeal by Australian ballot.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 100; amended

2005, No. 30

, § 2;

2005, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 5, 2006;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 4443.
Adoption, amendment, or repeal of capital budget and program.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a capital budget and program may be adopted, amended, or repealed by the legislative body of a municipality following one or more public hearings, upon public notice, if a utility and facilities plan as described in subdivision 4382(a)(4) of this title has been adopted by the legislative body in accordance with sections 4384 and 4385 of this title. A copy of the proposed capital budget and program shall be filed at least 15 days prior to the final public hearing with the clerk of the municipality and the secretary of the planning commission. The planning commission may submit a report on the proposal to the legislative body prior to the public hearing.

The capital budget and program, or its amendment or repeal, shall be adopted or rejected by an act of the legislative body of a municipality promptly after the final public hearing held under subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 4444.
Public hearing notice for adoption, amendment, or repeal of bylaw and other regulatory tools.

Any public notice required for public hearing under this subchapter shall be given not less than 15 days prior to the date of the public hearing by:

the publication of the date, place, and purpose of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality affected;

the posting of the same information in three or more public places within the municipality in conformance with location requirements of

1 V.S.A. § 312(c)(2)

; and

compliance with subsection (b) or (c) of this section.

A municipality may complete public notice commenced under subsection (a) of this section by publishing and posting the full text of the proposed material or by publishing and posting the following:

A statement of purpose.

A map or description of the geographic areas affected.

A table of contents or list of section headings.

A description of a place within the municipality where the full text may be examined.

As an alternative to the publication and posting provisions established under subsection (b) of this section, a municipality may make reasonable effort to mail or deliver copies of the full text or the material specified in subdivisions (b)(1) through (4) of this section, together with the public hearing notice of the proposed material and the public hearing notice to each voter, as evidenced by the voter checklist of the municipality, and to each owner of land within the municipality, as evidenced by the grand list of the municipality.

No defect in the form or substance of any public hearing notice under this chapter shall invalidate the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any plan, bylaw, or capital budget and program. However, the action shall be invalidated if the notice is materially misleading in content or fails to include one of the elements required by subsection (b) of this section or if the defect was the result of a deliberate or intentional act.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 4445.
Availability and distribution of documents.

Current copies of plans, bylaws, and capital budgets and programs shall be available to the public during normal business hours in the office of the clerk of any municipality in which those plans, bylaws, or capital budgets or programs have been adopted. The municipality shall provide all final adopted bylaws, amendments, or repeals to the regional planning commission of the area in which the municipality is located and to the Department of Commerce and Community Development, which may be done electronically, provided the sender has proof of receipt.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 100; amended

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 4445a.
Repealed. 2003, No. 115 (Adj. Sess.), § 119(c).

§ 4446.
Bylaws; effect of adoption.

Within the jurisdiction of any municipality that has adopted any of the bylaws authorized by this chapter, no land development may be undertaken or effected except in conformance with those bylaws. Bylaws authorized by this chapter may specify for exclusion from review any land development determined to impose no impact or merely a de minimus impact on the surrounding area and the overall pattern of land development.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 4447.
Clerk’s certificate.

A certificate of the clerk of a municipality showing the publication, posting, consideration, and adoption or amendment of a plan, bylaw, or capital budget or program shall be presumptive evidence of the facts as they relate to the lawful adoption or amendment of that plan, bylaw, or capital budget or program, so stated in any action or proceeding in court or before any board, commission, or other tribunal.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 4448.
Appointment and powers of administrative officer.

An administrative officer, who may hold any other office in the municipality other than membership in the board of adjustment or development review board, shall be nominated by the planning commission and appointed by the legislative body for a term of three years promptly after the adoption of the first bylaws or when a vacancy exists. The compensation of the administrative officer shall be fixed under sections 932 and 933 of this title, and the officer shall be subject to the personnel rules of the municipality adopted under sections 1121 and 1122 of this title. The administrative officer shall administer the bylaws literally and shall not have the power to permit any land development that is not in conformance with those bylaws. An administrative officer may be removed for cause at any time by the legislative body after consultation with the planning commission.

The planning commission may nominate and the legislative body may appoint an acting administrative officer who shall have the same duties and responsibilities as the administrative officer in the administrative officer’s absence. If an acting administrative officer position is established, or, for municipalities that establish the position of assistant administrative officer, there shall be clear policies regarding the authority of the administrative officer in relation to the acting or assistant officer.

The administrative officer should provide an applicant with forms required to obtain any municipal permit or other municipal authorization required under this chapter, or under other laws or ordinances that relate to the regulation by municipalities of land development. If other municipal permits or authorizations are required, the administrative officer should coordinate a unified effort on behalf of the municipality in administering its development review programs. The administrative officer should inform any person applying for municipal permits or authorizations that the person should contact the regional permit specialist employed by the Agency of Natural Resources in order to assure timely action on any related State permits; nevertheless, the applicant retains the obligation to identify, apply for, and obtain relevant State permits.

If the administrative officer fails to act with regard to a complete application for a permit within 30 days, whether by issuing a decision or by making a referral to the appropriate municipal panel, a permit shall be deemed issued on the 31st day.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 4449.
Zoning permit, certificate of occupancy, and municipal land use permit.

Within any municipality in which any bylaws have been adopted:

No land development may be commenced within the area affected by the bylaws without a permit issued by the administrative officer. No permit may be issued by the administrative officer except in conformance with the bylaws. When an application for a municipal land use permit seeks approval of a structure, the administrative officer shall provide the applicant with a copy of the applicable building energy standards under

30 V.S.A. §§ 51

(residential building energy standards) and 53 (commercial building energy standards). However, the administrative officer need not provide a copy of the standards if the structure is a sign or a fence or the application certifies that the structure will not be heated or cooled. In addition, the administrative officer may provide a copy of the Vermont Residential Building Energy Code Book published by the Department of Public Service in lieu of the full text of the residential building energy standards.

If the bylaws so adopted so provide, it shall be unlawful to use or occupy or permit the use or occupancy of any land or structure, or part thereof, created, erected, changed, converted, or wholly or partly altered or enlarged in its use or structure after the effective date of this chapter, within the area affected by those bylaws, until a certificate of occupancy is issued therefor by the administrative officer, stating that the proposed use of the structure or land conforms to the requirements of those bylaws. Provision of a certificate as required by

30 V.S.A. § 51

(residential building energy standards) or 53 (commercial building energy standards) shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of any such certificate of occupancy.

No permit issued pursuant to this section shall take effect until the time for appeal in section 4465 of this title has passed, or in the event that a notice of appeal is properly filed, no such permit shall take effect until adjudication of that appeal by the appropriate municipal panel is complete and the time for taking an appeal to the Environmental Division has passed without an appeal being taken. If an appeal is taken to the Environmental Division, the permit shall not take effect until the Environmental Division rules in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 8504

on whether to issue a stay, or until the expiration of 15 days, whichever comes first.

Each permit issued under this section shall contain a statement of the period of time within which an appeal may be taken and shall require posting of a notice of permit on a form prescribed by the municipality within view from the public right-of-way most nearly adjacent to the subject property until the time for appeal in section 4465 of this title has passed. Within three days following the issuance of a permit, the administrative officer shall:

deliver a copy of the permit to the listers of the municipality; and

post a copy of the permit in at least one public place in the municipality until the expiration of 15 days from the date of issuance of the permit.

Within 30 days after a municipal land use permit has been issued or within 30 days of the issuance of any notice of violation, the appropriate municipal official shall:
(c) (1) Within 30 days after a municipal land use permit has been issued or within 30 days of the issuance of any notice of violation, the appropriate municipal official shall:

deliver the original or a legible copy of the municipal land use permit or notice of violation or a notice of municipal land use permit generally in the form set forth in subsection 1154(c) of this title to the town clerk for recording as provided in subsection 1154(a) of this title; and

file a copy of that municipal land use permit in the offices of the municipality in a location where all municipal land use permits shall be kept.

The municipal officer may charge the applicant for the cost of the recording fees as required by law.

If a public notice for a first public hearing pursuant to subsection 4442(a) of this title is issued under this chapter by the local legislative body with respect to the adoption or amendment of a bylaw, or an amendment to an ordinance adopted under prior enabling laws, the administrative officer, for a period of 150 days following that notice, shall review any new application filed after the date of the notice under the proposed bylaw or amendment and applicable existing bylaws and ordinances. If the new bylaw or amendment has not been adopted by the conclusion of the 150-day period or if the proposed bylaw or amendment is rejected, the permit shall be reviewed under existing bylaws and ordinances. An application that has been denied under a proposed bylaw or amendment that has been rejected or that has not been adopted within the 150-day period shall be reviewed again, at no cost, under the existing bylaws and ordinances, upon request of the applicant. Any determination by the administrative officer under this section shall be subject to appeal as provided in section 4465 of this title.

Beginning October 1, 2010, any application for an approval or permit and any approval or permit issued under this section shall include a statement, in content and form approved by the Secretary of Natural Resources, that State permits may be required and that the permittee should contact State agencies to determine what permits must be obtained before any construction may commence.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 100; amended

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § F27;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236;

2013, No. 89

, §§ 9, 11.

§ 4450.
Eligibility to apply for permits.

Municipalities and solid waste management districts empowered to condemn property or an interest in property may apply for any permit or approval required by any bylaws adopted under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 101.

§ 4451.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any person who violates any bylaw after it has been adopted under this chapter or who violates a comparable ordinance or regulation adopted under prior enabling laws shall be fined not more than $200.00 for each offense. No action may be brought under this section unless the alleged offender has had at least seven days’ warning notice by certified mail. An action may be brought without the seven-day notice and opportunity to cure if the alleged offender repeats the violation of the bylaw or ordinance after the seven-day notice period and within the next succeeding 12 months.

The seven-day warning notice shall state that a violation exists, that the alleged offender has an opportunity to cure the violation within the seven days, and that the alleged offender will not be entitled to an additional warning notice for a violation occurring after the seven days.

A notice of violation issued under this chapter also shall state:

the bylaw or municipal land use permit condition alleged to have been violated;

the facts giving rise to the alleged violation;

to whom appeal may be taken and the period of time for taking an appeal; and

that failure to file an appeal within that period will render the notice of violation the final decision on the violation addressed in the notice.

In default of payment of the fine, the person, the members of any partnership, or the principal officers of the corporation shall each pay double the amount of the fine. Each day that a violation is continued shall constitute a separate offense. All fines collected for the violation of bylaws shall be paid over to the municipality whose bylaw has been violated.

Any person who, being the owner or agent of the owner of any lot, tract, or parcel of land, lays out, constructs, opens, or dedicates any street, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, water main, or other improvements for public use, travel, or other purposes or for the common use of occupants of buildings abutting thereon, or sells, transfers, or agrees or enters into an agreement to sell any land in a subdivision or land development whether by reference to or by other use of a plat of that subdivision or land development or otherwise, or erects any structure on that land, unless a final plat has been prepared in full compliance with this chapter and the bylaws adopted under this chapter and has been recorded as provided in this chapter, shall be fined not more than $200.00, and each lot or parcel so transferred or sold or agreed or included in a contract to be sold shall be deemed a separate violation. All fines collected for these violations shall be paid over to the municipality whose bylaw has been violated. The description by metes and bounds in the instrument of transfer or other document used in the process of selling or transferring shall not exempt the seller or transferor from these penalties or from the remedies provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 101; amended

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. May 27, 2014.

§ 4452.
Enforcement; remedies.

If any street, building, structure, or land is or is proposed to be erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, converted, maintained, or used in violation of any bylaw adopted under this chapter, the administrative officer shall institute in the name of the municipality any appropriate action, injunction, or other proceeding to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate that construction or use, or to prevent, in or about those premises, any act, conduct, business, or use constituting a violation. A court action under this section may be initiated in the Environmental Division, or as appropriate, before the Judicial Bureau, as provided under section 1974a of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 101; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236.

§ 4453.
Challenges to housing provisions in bylaws.

The Attorney General or a designee shall investigate when there is a complaint that a bylaw or its manner of administration violates subdivision 4412(1) of this title, relating to equal treatment of housing and adequate provision of affordable housing. Upon determining that a violation has occurred, the Attorney General may file an action in the Environmental Division to challenge the validity of the bylaw or its manner of administration. In this action, the municipality shall have the burden of proof to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the challenged bylaw or its manner of administration does not violate the provisions of subdivision 4412(1) of this title. If the Division finds the bylaw or its administration to be in violation, it shall grant the municipality a reasonable period of time to correct the violation and may extend that time. If the violation continues after that time, the Division shall order the municipality to grant all requested permits and certificates of occupancy for housing relating to the area of continuing violation.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 101; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236.

§ 4454.
Enforcement; limitations.

An action, injunction, or other enforcement proceeding relating to the failure to obtain or comply with the terms and conditions of any required municipal land use permit may be instituted under section 1974a, 4451, or 4452 of this title against the alleged offender if the action, injunction, or other enforcement proceeding is instituted within 15 years from the date the alleged violation first occurred and not thereafter, except that the 15-year limitation for instituting an action, injunction, or enforcement proceeding shall not apply to any action, injunction, or enforcement proceeding instituted for a violation of chapter 61, subchapter 10. The burden of proving the date the alleged violation first occurred shall be on the person against whom the enforcement action is instituted.

No action, injunction, or other enforcement proceeding may be instituted to enforce an alleged violation of a municipal land use permit that received final approval from the applicable board, commissioner, or officer of the municipality after July 1, 1998, unless the municipal land use permit or a notice of the permit generally in the form provided for in subsection 1154(c) of this title was recorded in the land records of the municipality as required by subsection 4449(c) of this title.

Nothing in this section shall prevent any action, injunction, or other enforcement proceeding by a municipality under any other authority it may have, including a municipality’s authority under Title 18, relating to the authority to abate or remove public health risks or hazards.

As used in this section, “person” means any of the following:
(d) (1) As used in this section, “person” means any of the following:

An individual, partnership, corporation, association, unincorporated organization, trust, or other legal or commercial entity, including a joint venture or affiliated ownership.

A municipality or State agency.

Individuals and entities affiliated with each other for profit, consideration, or any other beneficial interest derived from real estate.

The following individuals and entities shall be presumed not to be affiliated with a person for the purpose of profit, consideration, or other beneficial interest within the meaning of this section, unless there is substantial evidence of an intent to evade the purposes of this section:

A stockholder in a corporation shall be presumed not to be affiliated with a person solely on the basis of being a stockholder if the stockholder owns, controls, or has a beneficial interest in less than five percent of the outstanding shares in the corporation.

An individual shall be presumed not to be affiliated with a person solely for actions taken as an agent of another within the normal scope of duties of a court-appointed guardian, licensed attorney, real estate broker or salesperson, engineer, or land surveyor, unless the compensation received or beneficial interest obtained as a result of these duties indicates more than an agency relationship.

A seller or chartered lending institution shall be presumed not to be affiliated with a person solely for financing all or a portion of the purchase price at rates not substantially higher than prevailing lending rates in the community.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 101; amended

2009, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 3a.

§ 4455.
Revocation.

On petition by the municipality and after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Environmental Division may revoke a municipal land use permit issued under this chapter, including a permit for a telecommunications facility, on a determination that the permittee violated the terms of the permit or obtained the permit based on misrepresentation of material fact.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 54

, § 47, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236.